Maryland, session 2026, SB0892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–201.
In this subtitle, “Advisory Council” means the State Advisory Council on Health and
Wellness.
13–203.
(a) The Advisory Council consists of [34] voting members appointed by the
Secretary.
(b) The following members shall serve without term limits:
(1) The Secretary [of Health], or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) The State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(3) The Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) A representative of the Maryland Office of Minority Health and Health
Disparities; [and]
(6) A representative of the Maryland Association of County Health
Officers; AND
(7) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION
FOR WOMEN, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(c) The following members are subject to term limits:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(1) One representative of the American Heart Association Mid–Atlantic,
Inc., nominated by the Executive Director of the Association;
(2) One representative of the Arthritis Foundation, Mid–Atlantic Region,
Maryland, nominated by the Executive Director of the Foundation;
(3) One representative of the American Diabetes Association, Maryland
Chapter, nominated by the Executive Director of the Association;
(4) One representative of Johns Hopkins Medicine, nominated by the Chief
Executive Officer of Johns Hopkins Medicine;
(5) One representative of MedChi, the Maryland State Medical Society,
nominated by the Executive Director of MedChi;
(6) One representative of the University of Maryland Medical Center and
University of Maryland School of Medicine, nominated by the Chief Executive Officer of the
Medical Center and the Dean of the School of Medicine;
(7) One representative of the Maryland Chapter of the American Academy
of Pediatrics, nominated by the Executive Director of the Chapter;
(8) One representative of the Maryland Nurses Association, nominated by
the Executive Director of the Association;
(9) One representative of the Maryland Academy of Nutrition and
Dietetics, nominated by the President of the Academy;
(10) One representative of the Maryland Chapter of the American College of
Emergency Physicians, nominated by the President of the Chapter; [and]
(11) ONE REPRESENTATIVE WITH EXPERTISE IN PERIMENOPAUSAL,
MENOPAUSAL, AND POSTMENOPAUSAL EVALUATION AND TREATMENT; AND
(12) [Eighteen] SEVENTEEN members of the public, who may include:
(i) Individuals with a chronic disease or family members of an
individual with a chronic disease;
(ii) Licensed health care providers;
(iii) Individuals with a physical fitness background;
(iv) Employers or representatives of the business sector;
(v) Representatives of health insurers;
– 3 –

Ch. 605 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) Representatives of community–based organizations; and
(vii) Individuals with expressed interest in health and wellness.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to members who are subject to term limits.
(2) The term of a member is 4 years.
(3) The terms of members are staggered as required by the terms provided
for members of the Advisory Council on October 1, 2017.
(4) A member may serve two consecutive full terms.
(5) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(6) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(7) A member who serves two consecutive full 4–year terms may not be
reappointed for 4 years after the completion of those terms.
(e) If a vacancy occurs, the Secretary promptly shall appoint a successor.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–231.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE ISSUED
BY A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD UNDER TITLE 7, 9, 20, OR 21 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT REQUIRES A LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER TO
COMPLETE CONTINUING EDUCATION AS A CONDITION OF THE RENEWAL OF THE
LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE SHALL GRANT AT LEAST 2 HOURS OF CONTINUING
EDUCATION CREDITS FOR EVERY HOUR OF CONTINUING EDUCATION ON
PERIMENOPAUSAL, MENOPAUSAL, AND POSTMENOPAUSAL EVALUATION AND
TREATMENT THAT THE LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER COMPLETES.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(2) A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY ESTABLISH A MAXIMUM
NUMBER OF CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS THAT MAY BE GRANTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER
WHO EVALUATES AND MANAGES MENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE–ASSOCIATED
SYMPTOMS WHILE ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE.
(B) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT REQUIRES A LICENSEE OR
CERTIFICATE HOLDER TO COMPLETE CONTINUING EDUCATION AS A CONDITION OF
THE RENEWAL OF THE LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE SHALL GRANT AT LEAST 2 HOURS
OF CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS FOR EVERY 1 HOUR OF CONTINUING
EDUCATION ON MENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE–ASSOCIATED SYMPTOMS
COMPLETED BY THE LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY AT LEAST ONE TRAINING
PROGRAM FOR LICENSEES AND CERTIFICATE HOLDERS REGARDING THE
EVALUATION AND MANAGEMENT OF MENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE–ASSOCIATED
SYMPTOMS THAT MAY BE USED FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) IN IDENTIFYING A TRAINING PROGRAM UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH PROFESSIONAL
ASSOCIATIONS WITH EXPERTISE IN MENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE–ASSOCIATED
SYMPTOMS, INCLUDING THE MENOPAUSE SOCIETY.
(D) A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS THAT
MAY BE GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland
Health Care Commission shall read as follows:
(1) in consultation with the Maryland Department of Health, the Maryland
Insurance Administration, and the Maryland Commission for Women, evaluate coverage
and barriers to coverage of the evaluation and treatment of perimenopausal, menopausal,
and postmenopausal conditions, including coverage of hormone replacement therapy and
preauthorization and step–therapy requirements; and
(2) on or before December 1, 2026, shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
– 5 –

Ch. 605 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
THE EVALUATION AND MANAGEMENT OF MENOPAUSE AND
MENOPAUSE–ASSOCIATED SYMPTOMS AS DETERMINED BY THE TREATING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER.
SECTION 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Commission
for Women shall:
(1) evaluate opportunities for State policy initiatives that improve the
health and economic security of individuals in the State with perimenopausal, menopausal,
and postmenopausal conditions; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2027, report its findings and recommendations
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 5. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department
of Health shall:
(1) in consultation with the State Community Health Worker Advisory
Committee, evaluate and develop an action plan to increase access to perimenopausal,
menopausal, and postmenopausal health care services through the outreach of community
health workers to consumers; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2027, submit its evaluation and recommended
action plan to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
SECTION 6. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department
of Health shall:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(1) in consultation with health care provider professional associations and
institutions of higher education, including community colleges, evaluate methods for
increasing opportunities for clinical education, including postgraduate education, on
perimenopausal, menopausal, and postmenopausal evaluation and treatment; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2027, report its findings and recommendations
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 1 of this Act shall
take effect October 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 7 Sections 7 and 8 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 7 –